Nevada, session 83, SB472.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$4,325,366 for expenditures related to instruction that are due to
caseload adjustments at the University of Nevada, Las Vegas.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$291,526 for expenditures related to instruction that are due to
caseload adjustments at Nevada State University.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
-
*SB472_R1*

– 2 –
$1,963,392 for expenditures related to instruction that are due to
caseload adjustments at the College of Southern Nevada.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$938,124 for expenditures related to instruction that are due to
caseload adjustments at Western Nevada College.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada System of Higher Education the sum of
$2,203,368 for expenditures related to instruction that are due to
caseload adjustments at Truckee Meadows Community College.
Sec. 6. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
sections 1 to 5, inclusive, of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 7. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB472_R1*